District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.07

Rules for preferential tuition rates for District residents.

(a)

Within 90 days of August 1, 1996, the Trustees will consider and adopt uniform rules applicable to students of the University, including the School of Law, setting forth the requirements for preferential tuition rates for bona fide residents of the District of Columbia and requirements for recognition of changes in residency status.

(b)

The Trustees shall establish the tuition rate for nonresident students at the University of the District of Columbia flagship undergraduate program, graduate program, and the Community College of the District of Columbia, at a level no lower than the nonresident tuition rate charged at comparable public institutions of higher education.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1429, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 407
as added Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 301(f), 43 DCR 2978
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 4062, 58 DCR 6226

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1537.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 19-21 designate the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary addition of section, see § 301(f) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-264, April 26, 1996, 43 DCR 2412), and § 201(f) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).
Section 501 of D.C. Act 11-335 provided for the application of the act.

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 4061 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle G of title IV of the act may be cited as “University of the District of Columbia Nonresident Tuition Amendment Act of 2011”.

Short Title